Maine, session 132, LD2089.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §586, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 387, §2, is amended to read:
§586. Agricultural labor housing standards
The bureau shall adopt rules for the protection of the health, safety and welfare of the
agricultural laborers and their families who occupy housing provided, owned or controlled
by their employers. These rules apply only to housing facilities of employers of agricultural
labor who provide housing to more than 5 employees and whose minimum housing
habitability standards are not already established under the regulations on housing
promulgated by the United States Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health
Administration under the federal Migrant and Seasonal Agricultural Worker Protection
Act, 29 United States Code, Sections 1801 et seq. The rules adopted under this subchapter
must be identical to the federal housing habitability regulations promulgated to protect
seasonal and migrant workers under the authority of the federal Migrant and Seasonal
Agricultural Worker Protection Act. Rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter section are
routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter II‑A 2-A.